Florida, session 2026, HB713.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 30.10, Florida Statutes, is amended to
read:
30.10 Place of office.—The place of office of every
sheriff may shall be at any location within the county lines
seat of the county.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb713-00